apertium-eng-hin.eng.dix
<pardef n="zebra__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="BBC__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="DNA__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="acronimos_par">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="re"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="re"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="acronimos">
  <e>       <re>[A-Z][A-Z]</re><par n="acronimos_par"/></e>
  <e>       <re>[A-Z][A-Z][A-Z]</re><par n="acronimos_par"/></e>
  <e>       <re>[A-Z][A-Z][A-Z][A-Z]</re><par n="acronimos_par"/></e>
  <e>       <re>[A-Z][A-Z][A-Z][A-Z][A-Z]</re><par n="acronimos_par"/></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="Linux__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="Barcelona__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="United_States__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Mark__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Mary__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Smith__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Ifans__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="litero">
<!--
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="alpha"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


  <!--        Numbers    par defs -->

<pardef n="one__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="two__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<!--
    <e><p><l><b/>hundred</l><r><b/>hundred<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>hundred<b/>and</l><r><b/>hundred<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l><b/>thousand</l><r><b/>thousand<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>thousand<b/>and</l><r><b/>thousand<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
-->
</pardef>

<pardef n="hundred__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="twenty__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-one</l>      <r>-one</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-two</l>      <r>-two</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-three</l>    <r>-three</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-four</l>     <r>-four</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-five</l>     <r>-five</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-six</l>      <r>-six</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-seven</l>    <r>-seven</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-eight</l>    <r>-eight</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-nine</l>     <r>-nine</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
</pardef>

<!-- JN All paradigms had entries like:
    <e><p><l>ving</l><r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ving</l><r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    which I have deleted per 12feb 2009

TODO:<jacobEo> Regarding the <s n="subs"/>, perhaps I shouuld change
<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/> to  <s n="vblex"/><par n="ger_subs"/> and then
I can switch <subs> on and off in a ger_subs paradigm?

<jimregan> yes
<jimregan> put them in a pardef, and leave yourself one small change for the future - good thinking :)

-->


<pardef n="will/__vbmod">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="c/an__vbmod">
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>an</l>        <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ould</l>      <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ha/ve__vbmod">
  <e>       <p><l>ve</l>        <r>ve<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ve</l>        <r>ve<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>ve<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>ve<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>d</l>         <r>ve<s n="vaux"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ving</l>      <r>ve<s n="vaux"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ha/ve__vbhaver">
  <e>       <p><l>ve</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ve</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>d</l>         <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ving</l>      <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="d/o__vaux">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oes</l>       <r>o<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>id</l>        <r>o<s n="vbdo"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/be__vbser">
  <e>       <p><l>be</l>        <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>are</l>       <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>am</l>        <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>was</l>       <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>was</l>       <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>were</l>      <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>been</l>      <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>being</l>     <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="Balkans">         <i>Balkans</i><par n="United_States__np"/><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
<e lm="BBC">             <i>BBC</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="Bush">     <i>Bush</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Charli">          <i>Charli</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="cm">              <i>cm</i><par n="DNA__n"/></e>
<e lm="Erberto">         <i>Erberto</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="EU">              <i>EU</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="euro">            <i>euro</i><par n="zebra__n"/></e>
<e lm="Evans">           <i>Evans</i><par n="Ifans__np"/><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
<e lm="f">               <i>f</i><par n="litero"/></e>
<e lm="GCompris">        <i>GCompris</i><par n="Linux__np"/><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
<e lm="Hniena">          <i>Hniena</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="IBM">             <i>IBM</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="India">           <i>India</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Birla">        <i>Birla</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Chawla">        <i>Chawla</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jenkins">         <i>Jenkins</i><par n="Ifans__np"/><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
<e lm="k">               <i>k</i><par n="litero"/></e>
<e lm="Lillian">         <i>Lillian</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ludolfo">         <i>Ludolfo</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Facebook">        <i>Facebook</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
<e lm="Google">        	 <i>Google</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
<e lm="McCain">          <i>McCain</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="mm">              <i>mm</i><par n="DNA__n"/></e>
<e lm="NASA">            <i>NASA</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="O'Regan">         <i>O'Regan</i><par n="Ifans__np"/></e>
<e lm="partridge">       <i>partridge</i><par n="zebra__n"/></e>
<e lm="Publia">          <i>Publia</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Pyrenees">        <i>Pyrenees</i><par n="United_States__np"/><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
<e lm="seed">            <i>seed</i><par n="zebra__n"/></e>
<e lm="squid">           <i>squid</i><par n="zebra__n"/></e>
<e lm="t">               <i>t</i><par n="litero"/></e>
<e lm="Tennessee">       <i>Tennessee</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="the Philippines"> <i>the<b/>Philippines</i><par n="United_States__np"/><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
<e lm="Thomson">         <i>Thomson</i><par n="Ifans__np"/></e>
<e lm="UN">              <i>UN</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="United States of America"><i>United<b/>States<b/>of<b/>America</i><par n="United_States__np"/></e>
<e lm="VAT">             <i>VAT</i><par n="DNA__n"/></e>
<e lm="Wikipedia">       <i>Wikipedia</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
<e lm="zebra">           <i>zebra</i><par n="zebra__n"/></e>
<e lm="Zinedine">        <i>Zinedine</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="crore">           <i>crore</i><par n="hundred__num"/></e>
<e lm="fifty">           <i>fifty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="five">            <i>five</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="forty">           <i>forty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="hundred">         <i>hundred</i><par n="hundred__num"/></e>
<e lm="thousand">        <i>thousand</i><par n="hundred__num"/></e>
<e lm="million">         <i>million</i><par n="hundred__num"/></e>
<e lm="nineteen">        <i>nineteen</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="one">             <i>one</i><par n="one__num"/></e>
<e lm="seventy">         <i>seventy</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="sixteen">         <i>sixteen</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="thirty">          <i>thirty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="two">             <i>two</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="can">             <i>c</i><par n="c/an__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="have to">         <i>ha</i><par n="ha/ve__vbmod"/><p><l><b/>to</l><r><g><b/>to</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="be descended">    <i></i><par n="/be__vbser"/><p><l><b/>descended</l><r><g><b/>descended</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="not be descended">    <i></i><par n="/be__vbser"/><p><l><b/>not<b/>descended</l><r><g><b/>not<b/>descended</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="be permitted">    <i></i><par n="/be__vbser"/><p><l><b/>permitted</l><r><g><b/>permitted</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="be possible">     <i></i><par n="/be__vbser"/><p><l><b/>possible</l><r><g><b/>possible</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="have">            <i>ha</i><par n="ha/ve__vbhaver"/></e>
<e lm="do">              <i>d</i><par n="d/o__vaux"/></e>
<e lm="Viet Nam">       <i>Viet<b/>Nam</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Cambodia">       <i>Cambodia</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="a"><i>a</i><par n="litero"/></e>
<e lm="ASA">             <i>ASA</i><par n="acronimos_par"/></e>
<e lm="CSM">             <i>CSM</i><par n="acronimos_par"/></e>
<e lm="KB">              <i>KB</i><par n="acronimos_par"/></e>
<e lm="RENFE">           <i>RENFE</i><par n="acronimos_par"/></e>
<e lm="XP">              <i>XP</i><par n="acronimos_par"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="acronimos"/></e>
<e lm="Tarani">           <i>Tarani</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
